Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1713
License; revocation, suspension, refuse renewal; when.

The department may revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a farm labor contractor license upon the department's own motion or upon complaint by any individual if:

(1) The licensee or his or her agent has violated or failed to comply with any provision of the Farm Labor Contractors Act;

(2) The conditions under which the license was issued have changed or no longer exist; or

(3) The licensee's character, reliability, or competence makes him or her an unfit farm labor contractor.

Laws 1987, LB 344, § 13.